Utah statutes.
78A-11-112.   Confidentiality.

(1)  The transmission, production, or disclosure of any complaints, papers, or testimony in the course of proceedings before the commission, the masters appointed under Section 78A-11-110, or the Supreme Court may not be introduced in any civil action.

(2)  The transmission, production, or disclosure of any complaints, papers, or testimony in the course of proceedings before the commission or the masters appointed under Section 78A-11-110 may be introduced in any criminal action, consistent with the Utah Rules of Evidence.  This information shall be shared with the prosecutor conducting a criminal investigation or prosecution of a judge as provided in Section 78A-11-106.

(3)  Complaints, papers, testimony, or the record of the commission's confidential hearing may not be disclosed by the commission, masters, or any court until the Supreme Court has entered its final order in accordance with this section, except:

(a)  upon order of the Supreme Court;

(b)  upon the request of the judge who is the subject of the complaint;

(c)  as provided in Subsection (4);

(d)  to aid in a criminal investigation or prosecution as provided in Section 78A-11-106; or

(e)  this information is subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Auditor General, and any records released to the Office of Legislative Auditor General shall be maintained as confidential, except:

(i)  for information that has already been made public; and

(ii)  the final written and oral audit report of the Legislative Auditor General may present information about the commission as long as it contains no specific information that would easily identify a judge, witness, or complainant.

(4)  If the Senate Judicial Confirmation Committee requests Judicial Conduct Commission records, the commission shall disclose the information to the Senate Judicial Confirmation Committee or its staff if the chair of the Senate Judicial Confirmation Committee certifies in writing that the committee will limit the disclosure of any information received to the minimum amount necessary to allow the Senate to evaluate the candidate's fitness for office.

(5)  Upon the dismissal of a complaint or allegation against a judge, the dismissal shall be disclosed without consent of the judge to the person who filed the complaint.

